Idaho, session 2026, H0674.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 62-612, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
62-612. RESTRICTION ON WITHDRAWAL OR DISCONTINUANCE OF SERVICE. (1) A
telephone corporation subject to this chapter which that provides basic lo-
cal exchange or message telecommunication service, may not withdraw or oth-
erwise discontinue such service to a local exchange area unless: one or more
alternative telephone corporations are furnishing the respective telecom-
munication service or equivalent service to the customers in such local ex-
change area at the time such service is withdrawn or otherwise discontinued.
(a) Such discontinuance is in accordance with the provisions of section
62-612A, Idaho Code; or
(b) One (1) or more alternative telephone corporations are furnishing
the respective telecommunication service or equivalent service to the
customers in such local exchange area at the time such service is with-
drawn or otherwise discontinued.
(2) A telephone corporation proposing to withdraw or otherwise discon-
tinue the services set forth in service to a local exchange area pursuant to
subsection (1)(b) of this section to a local exchange area shall file a no-
tice of such withdrawal or discontinuance of service with the commission and
shall publish a notice of such withdrawal in a legal newspaper circulated
within the local exchange area, and provide such other reasonable notice as
may be required by the commission.
(3) Any person or telephone corporation affected by a withdrawal or
discontinuance of such services by a telephone corporation subject to this
chapter, may, within thirty (30) days from the date of publication of the
notice, apply to the commission to determine whether such withdrawal or dis-
continuance of service is authorized pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 6, Title 62, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 62-612A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:


62-612A. DISCONTINUANCE OF SERVICE PURSUANT TO FEDERAL COMMUNICA-
TIONS COMMISSION PROCEDURES. If the federal communications commission
permits a telephone corporation to discontinue service under 47 U.S.C.
214(a) or other applicable provisions of federal law, the Idaho public
utilities commission shall recognize and adopt the federal communications
commission's discontinuance findings.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.